Hawaii statutes.
§186-4 Classification; rules. (a) If
the board finds that the property identified in the application is suited for
the raising of commercial tree species and other forest products in quantity
sufficient to establish a business in the sale thereof, and that the use will
not have a significant negative effect on a native forest ecosystem, the
property may be classified by the board as tree farm property.

(b) The board shall adopt rules pursuant to
chapter 91 necessary for the purposes of this chapter to include procedures,
conditions, and fees for establishing tree farms. [L 1963, c 141, §5; Supp,
§87D-5; HRS §186-4; am L 1969, c 170, §32; am L 1975, c 157, §29; am L 1989, c
50, §3; am L 1994, c 207, §3]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next